Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Subtitle 18. Miscellaneous Provisions

271B.18-010.
Validity of facsimile signature for corporation debt security.

On any bond, note, debenture or other debt security issued by a corporation, the signature of the officers of the corporation acting in connection with the issuance, and the seal of the corporation may be facsimiles if the instrument is authenticated or countersigned by a trustee or transfer agent, or registered by a registrar, other than the corporation itself or an employee of the corporation. In case any officer who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed upon a bond, note, debenture or other debt security shall have ceased to be such officer before such bond, note, debenture or other debt security is issued, it may be issued by the corporation with the same effect as if he were such officer at the date of its issue.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 274, § 138.

271B.18-020.
Retroactive validation of existing domestic corporations.

The corporate existence of each domestic corporation which, upon July 1, 1974, is listed as an existing corporation on the current corporate index maintained in the office of the secretary of state and is then engaged in the usual course of its business shall be, and it hereby is, validated retroactively to the date of its incorporation and continued for the period specified in its articles of incorporation and the amendments thereto, or for a period of one (1) year from July 1, 1974, whichever is greater, unless thereafter it is voluntarily dissolved or liquidated pursuant to law, or its separate existence ceases pursuant to KRS

271A.380

, or it has its corporate powers revoked pursuant to KRS

271A.470

, or its charter is repealed or vacated pursuant to KRS Chapter 415.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 274, § 139; 1974, ch. 158, § 1.

271B.18-030.
Acceptance of present Constitution.

Any corporation which was in existence at the time of the adoption of the present Constitution of this state and subsequent thereto has filed in the office of the Secretary of State any amendment of its charter or articles of incorporation shall thereby be deemed to have filed therein an acceptance of the provisions of that Constitution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 274, § 140.

271B.18-040.
Purpose of filing articles of incorporation.

The purpose of the provisions of this chapter requiring the filing or recording of the articles of incorporation, amendments thereto, and other papers, is to afford all persons the opportunity of acquiring knowledge of the contents thereof, but no person dealing with the corporation shall be charged with constructive notice of the contents of any such articles or papers by reason of such filing or recording.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 274, § 141.

271B.18-050.
Revocation of charters and grants since 1856.

All corporate charters granted and grants made to corporations since February 14, 1856, may be revoked by the General Assembly, unless a contrary intent is plainly expressed; but no revocation or repeal shall impair other rights previously vested.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 274, § 143.

271B.18-060.
Incorporation for purposes of establishing a foreign trade zone within this state.

Any corporation may be organized and chartered under the provisions of this chapter or under the provisions of KRS

273.161

to

273.400

for the purposes of establishing, operating, and maintaining a foreign trade zone within this state, under the provisions of 19 U.S.C.A. 81, as amended or reenacted, and may apply to the board created under the federal act for a grant of the privilege of establishing, operating, and maintaining such a zone. If the application is granted, the corporation may accept the grant and establish, operate, and maintain such a zone subject to the federal act, as amended or reenacted, and rules adopted thereunder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 305, § 2, effective July 13, 1984.

271B.18-070.
Additional penalties for violation of KRS 506.010, 506.030, 506.040, 521.020, or 521.050.

If a domestic corporation is convicted of a violation of KRS

506.010

,

506.030

,

506.040

,

521.020

, or

521.050

, or if an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation is convicted of violating any section specified above under circumstances which bring corporate liability under KRS 502.050(1)(b), the court shall order that the charter of the corporation be suspended for a period of not more than five (5) years for a first offense, ten (10) years for a second offense, and permanently for a third or subsequent offense.

If a foreign corporation is convicted of a violation of any section specified in subsection (1) of this section, or if an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation is convicted of violating any section specified in subsection (1) of this section under circumstances which bring corporate liability under KRS 502.050(1)(b), the court shall order that the corporation not be permitted to do business in Kentucky for the appropriate period specified in subsection (1) of this section.

The penalties specified in this section shall be in addition to any other penalty specified by law for the commission of the offenses listed in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 477, § 6, effective July 15, 1994.